New Jersey, session 222, S3910.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A parent or guardian of a home-schooled child shall submit to the superintendent of the resident school district no later than August 1 of each school year a letter informing the superintendent of the decision to home-school the child for that school year. The letter shall include the name, date of birth, and grade level of the child, and the name of the person who will provide instruction to the child. b.    A school district shall annually compile and make available for public inspection on its website information concerning the number of children who reside in the district who are being home-schooled and the grade levels of those children. 2.    This act shall take effect in the first full school year following the date of enactment.